Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.370

Negotiated service agreement.

(1) The assisted living facility licensee shall complete a negotiated service agreement using the preadmission assessment, initial resident service plan, and full reassessment information obtained under RCW 18.20.350 and 18.20.360. The licensee shall include the resident and the resident's legal representative if any, or the resident's representative if any, in the development of the negotiated service agreement. If the resident is a medicaid client, the department's case manager shall also be involved.

(2) The negotiated service agreement shall be completed or updated:

(a) Within thirty days of the date of move-in;

(b) As necessary following the annual full assessment of the resident; and

(c) Whenever the resident's negotiated service agreement no longer adequately addresses the resident's current needs and preferences.

[ 2012 c 10 s 26; 2004 c 142 s 9.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective dates—2004 c 142: See note following RCW 18.20.020.